New York, session 2025-2026, S923.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The election law is amended by adding a new section 5-312 2 to read as follows: 3 § 5-312. Enrollment; unenrollment from certain parties. Any person 4 enrolled in a party which includes the words "Independence" or "Inde- 5 pendent" shall have their voter enrollment changed such that they are 6 not enrolled in any party. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03191-01-5